Segmental/Segmental.foma
define Words @txt"in.txt";
define Auxiliary ["("|")"];
define AuxiliaryRemoval Auxiliary -> 0;
define Voiceless [п|т|к|х];
define Devoicing з -> с || _ "." Voiceless;
define Labial [п|б|м];
define Dental [т|д];
define Hushing [ч|ж|ш|щ|жд];
define Palatal [{л҄}|{н҄}|{р҄}];
define Glide [j|i̯];
define r1 ѣ -> а || [Hushing|Palatal|Glide] (".") _ ;
define r2 ы -> и, ъ -> ь || [Hushing|Palatal] (".") _ ;
define r3 ь -> и || Glide (".") _ ;
define r4 ь -> и, ъ -> ы || _ Glide ;
define r5 Glide -> 0 || _ (".") и ;
define r6 {з.ж} -> жд ;
define Velar [к|г|х];
define Simple [Labial|Dental|Velar];
define Hissing [с|з];
define Strident [Hushing|ц|s];
define ClusterSimplification1 Simple -> 0 || _ "." [Labial|Velar] ,, [п|б|м] -> 0, [т|д] -> с || _ "." [т|д] ,, [к|г] "." т -> щ || _ ; 
define ClusterSimplification2 [Simple|Hissing] -> 0 || _ (".") [Hissing|Strident] ,,
	[т|д] -> 0 || _ "." [н|л] ,,
	[..] -> т || с _ "." р ,,
	[..] -> д || з _ "." р ,,
	в -> 0 || [п|б|м] "." _ ;
define ClusterSimplification ClusterSimplification1 .o. ClusterSimplification2;
define BoundaryRemoval "." -> 0;
define Morphonology AuxiliaryRemoval
	.o. r1 .o. r2 .o. r3 .o. r4 .o. r5 .o. r6
	.o. Devoicing
	.o. ClusterSimplification
	.o. BoundaryRemoval;
define o0 i̯ -> j;
define o1 а -> ꙗ, е -> ѥ , ѧ -> ѩ , ѫ -> ѭ , у -> ю || [Palatal | j] _ ;
define o2 j -> 0 || _ [ꙗ|ѥ|ѩ|ѭ|ю];
define Orthography o0 .o. o1 .o. o2;
define Segmental Morphonology .o. Orthography;
